cli/samples/todos_spine_requirejs/js/vendor/speak/dictsource/pl_rules
 
// This file is UTF8 encoded 
// Spelling to phoneme words and exceptions for Polish

.L01	ka ki ce kę ką ko kach kom
//.L02	a i ę ą o

//.L03	a em ie owi o

//.L04	iego iemu ich imi im i

//.L05	o ę y ów ach ami a

//.L06 o a em ie

//.L07 to ta tem cie tami tom t

//.L08	a u ie em owi

//.L09	ach ami ów a ę y ą owie o

//.L10 a em owi ie u ach ami om

//.L11 a iem u

.group	 a
		a		a
		a	(_	a_
		ae	(_	E
	_)	ae	(rA	aE
	_)	ae		E
	_h)	al	(l	O
	h)	allowee	(n_	'alOwy
	h)	allowee	(n	alOwy
	C)	ai	(r	E
	_alt)	ai	(r	ai
	_k)	ai	(r	ai
	_)	archie		ERtSi
	_)	archie	(C	ERtS|;E
		acku	(p	Eka
	_)	arcy	(@P4t	aRtsy

	@ł)	a	(by_	=a
	@ł)	a	(bym_	=a
	@ł)	a	(byś_	=a

	@)	a	(łby_	=a
	@)	a	(łbym_	=a
	@)	a	(łbyś_	=a

.group	 ą
		ą		O~
		ą	(_	O~_
		ą	(_A	O~_
		ą	(p	Om
		ą	(b	Om
		ą	(t	On
		ą	(c	On
		ą	(d	On
		ą	(ć	On^
		ą	(dź	On^
		ą	(ci	On^
		ą	(dzi	On^
		ą	(k	ON
		ą	(g	ON
		ą	(l	O
		ą	(ł	O

.group	 b
	@@)	borg	(_S4t	bOrg
	@@)	berg	(_S4t	bErg
	@@)	börg	(_S4t	bErg
	@@)	børg	(_S4t	bErg

		b		b
	ja)	bł	(kA	p
		b	(_	p
		b	(i	b;
		bi	(A	b;j

.group	 c

		c		ts
		ch		h
		ch	(i	C
		chi	(A	hj
	psy)	chi	(a	hi
	_)	chic	(agA	Sik
		c	(i	ts;
		ci	(A	ts;
	li)	ci	(o_	sj
	li)	ci	(ą_	sj
	li)	ci	(ę_	sj
	li)	ci	(i_	sj
	li)	ci	(a_	sj
	ar)	ci	(o_	sij
	ar)	ci	(ą_	sij
	ar)	ci	(ę_	sij
	ar)	ci	(i_	sij
	ar)	ci	(a_	sij
	A)	ci	(ano_	sj
	A)	ci	(anowi_	sj
	A)	ci	(anie_	sj
	A)	ci	(anem_	sj
	A)	ci	(ana_	sj

		cc	(at_	k
		cc	(atom_	k
		cc	(atami_	k
		cc	(acie_	k
		cc	(atem_	k
		cc	(ata_	k
		cc	(ato_	k
		cc	(atA	k
		cc	(i_	tS
		cc	(im_	tS
		cc	(imi_	tS
		cc	(ich_	tS
		cc	(iemu_	tS
		cc	(iego_	tS
		cc	(inie_	tS
		cc	(inem_	tS
		cc	(ina_	tS
		cc	(ino_	tS
		cc	(iie_	tS
		cc	(iem_	tS
		cc	(ia_	tS
		cc	(io_	tS
	_mo)	cc	(A	k

		c	(at_	k
		c	(atom_	k
		c	(atami_	k
		c	(acie_	k
		c	(atem_	k
		c	(ata_	k
		c	(ato_	k
		cz		tS
		c	(osin	k
		c	(osecans	k
		c	(otang	k
	cose)	c	(ans	k
		ch	(ev	S
		ch	(err	S
	_ro)	ck	(A	k
	_dis)	c	(o	k
	_lin)	c	(oln	k
	_ar)	c	(adio_	k
	_ar)	c	(adią_	k
	_ar)	c	(adię_	k
	_ar)	c	(adii_	k
	_ar)	c	(adia_	k
	_)	ch	(risto	k
	_)	c	(abernet	k
	_)	ca	(m	kE
	_)	c	(amembert	ka
	_)	c	(an		k
	vi)	c	(e		ts
	vA)	c		k
	vA)	ck		k
	_de)	ck		k
	_de)	c	(or	k
	vA)	ch		tS
		casc		kask
	di)	c	(tA	k
		c	(alv	k
		cal	(l	kO
		cal	(lA	ka
		c	(s	k
		caly	(ps	kali
	_)	c	(alend	k
	_)	c	(app	k
	_)	c	(arp	k
	_)	c	(arl	k
	_)	c	(art	k
	_)	c	(arav	k
	_)	c	(arv	k
	_)	cic	(eron	tSitS
	_)	challeng (er	tSElEndZ
		cha	(mpi	tZE
		chan	(nel	tSa
	_)	charle	(s	tSaRls
	_)	chie	(f	tSi
	_)	ch	(ip	tS
	_)	chippendal (A	tSipEndEjl
	_)	chopi	(n	SOpE
	_)	chow	(der	tSaw
	_)	c	(iner	s
	_)	c	(ir	ts
	_)	c	(lA	k
		c	(lip	k
	_)	clow	(n	klaw
	_)	clea	(C	kli
	_)	cloch	(ard	klOS
	_)	clois	(o	kluaz
	_)	coach		kOwtS
	_)	cock		kOk
	_)	c	(om	k
	_)	c	(omber	ts
	_)	c	(ombrA	ts
	_)	c	(omies	ts
	_)	c	(ominu	ts
	_)	conc	(ert	kOntS
	_)	c	(onC	k
	_)	copywri	(t	kOpyRaj
	_)	c	(orC	k
	_)	c	(owbo	k
		crack		kRak
	_)	croiss		kRruas
	_)	c	(r	k
	_)	c	(umul	k
	_)	curie		kiRi
	_)	cu	(rli	kE
		cresc	(end	kREStS

	_)	c	(aps_	k
	_)	c	(apslo	k
	lo)	ck	(_	k
	lo)	ck	(u_	k
	lo)	ck	(iem_	k
	lo)	ck	(a_	k
	_s)	creenrea (d	kRinRi

.group	 ć
		ć		ts;
		ć	(b	dz;
		ć	(g	dz;

.group	 d
		d		d
		d	(_	t
		d	(i	d;
		di	(A	dj
		dies	(lA	d;iz
		dies	(el	d;iz
		dz		dz
		dz	(_	ts
		dz	(i	dz;
		dzi	(A	dz;
	_na)	dzi	(em	d|Z;
	_po)	dzi	(em	d|Z;
		dź		dz;
		dź	(_	ts;
		dż		dZ
		dż	(_	tS

	_o)	dż		d|Z
	_po)	dż		d|Z
	_na)	dż		d|Z
	_pona)	dż		d|Z

.group	 e
		e		E
        i)      e (_		E#

	@)	e	(Cłbym_	=E
	@)	e	(Cłbyś_	=E
	@)	e	(Cłby_	=E

	_)	ei	(C	aj
	_kl)	ei	(n	aj

		e	(_A	E_
		ee	(n	i
	_C)	ee	(_	i
	_C)	ea	(_	i
	sp)	ea	(k	i
	d)	ea	(ler	i
	l)	eas	(in	iz
	_l)	ea	(d	i
	h)	eavy	(K	Evi
	_h)	ea	(d	E
	_h)	ea	(le	i
	r)	ea	(gan	E
	r)	eality	(_	i'Elity
	t)	ea	(tr	Ea
	t)	ea		i
		eu	(tsch	Oj

	_)	email		imEjl

.group	 ~
		~

.group	 ę
		ę		E~
		ę	(_	E
		ę	(_A	E_
		ę	(p	Em
		ę	(b	Em
		ę	(t	En
		ę	(c	En
		ę	(d	En
		ęć	(dzie	En^
		ę	(dzi	En^
		ę	(ci	En^
		ę	(ć	En^
		ę	(si	En^
		ę	(ś	En^
		ę	(dź	En^
		ę	(k	EN
		ę	(g	EN
		ę	(l	E
		ę	(ł	E
	i)	ę	(tna	E

.group	 f
		f		f
		fi	(A	f;j

.group	 g
		g		g
		g	(i	g;
	hi)	gi	(e	gj
		g	(_	k
		gł	(_	gw
		gh		g
		gate	(s	gEjt
	_)	gentleman		dZEntElmEn
	_)	georgi	(o_	dZORdZj
	_)	georgi	(ą_	dZORdZj
	_)	georgi	(ę_	dZORdZj
	_)	georgi	(i_	dZORdZj
	_)	georgi	(a_	dZORdZj

.group	 h
		h		x
		hi	(A	xj
		h	(i	C

.group	 i
		i		i
		i	(A_+	j
	A)	i	(A	j
	C)	i	(A	;

	_kl)	i	(e	;ij
	żm)	ii	(_	iji
	rak)	ii	(_	iji
	_f)	ire	(fox_	'ajER
	_f)	ire	(fo	ajER
	_m)	ic	(ro	ajk

	C)	ie	(_	;E#
	_t)	ime		ajm
	_t)	ime	(r	ajmE
	_dr)	i	(v	aj


	_ep) i (L01 =i
	_rytm) i (L01_ =i
	_term) i (L01_ =i

	_domin) i (kom_++ i
	_domin) i (kach_++ i
	_domin) i (ko_++ i
	_domin) i (ką_++ i
	_domin) i (kę_++ i
	_domin) i (ce_++ i
	_domin) i (ki_++ i
	_domin) i (ka_++ i
	_weron) i (kom_++ i
	_weron) i (kach_++ i
	_weron) i (ko_++ i
	_weron) i (ką_++ i
	_weron) i (kę_++ i
	_weron) i (ce_++ i
	_weron) i (ki_++ i
	_weron) i (ka_++ i

	_ton) i (ka_ =i
	_ton) i (ki_ =i
	_ton) i (kach_ =i
	tekton) i (ka_ =i
	tekton) i (ki_ =i
	tekton) i (kach_ =i
	taton) i (ka_ =i
	taton) i (ki_ =i
	taton) i (kach_ =i
	ton) i (ce_ =i
	ton) i (kę_ =i
	ton) i (ką_ =i
	ton) i (ko_ =i

	@alm) i (L01_ =i
	@aul) i (L01_ =i
	@bol) i (L01_ =i
	@cha) i (L01_ =i
	@chn) i (L01_ =i
	@cyf) i (L01_ =i
	@eon) i (L01_ =i
	@epl) i (L01_ =i
	@erm) i (L01_ =i
	@ero) i (L01_ =i
	@fon) i (L01_ =i
	@gan) i (L01_ =i
	@gen) i (L01_ =i
	@gog) i (L01_ =i
	@han) i (L01_ =i
	@hol) i (L01_ =i
	@ion) i (L01_ =i
	@ipp) i (L01_ =i
	@jsm) i (L01_ =i
	@kom) i (L01_ =i
	@lab) i (L01_ =i
	@law) i (L01_ =i
	@lem) i (L01_ =i
	@lif) i (L01_ =i
	@lin) i (L01_ =i
	log) i (L01_ =i
	mim) i (L01_ =i
	@mon) i (L01_ =i
	@mun) i (L01_ =i
	@nam) i (L01_ =i
	@nem) i (L01_ =i
	@nim) i (L01_ =i
	@nom) i (L01_ =i
	@non) i (L01_ =i
	@orm) i (L01_ =i
	@oza) i (L01_ =i
	@pon) i (L01_ =i
	@raf) i (L01_ =i
	@rag) i (L01_ =i
	@ram) i (L01_ =i
	@rof) i (L01_ =i
	@rom) i (L01_ =i
	@ron) i (L01_ =i
	@rop) i (L01_ =i
	@sem) i (L01_ =i
	@tal) i (L01_ =i
	@tan) i (L01_ =i
	@uan) i (L01_ =i
	@ubl) i (L01_ =i
	@uda) i (L01_ =i
	@urg) i (L01_ =i
	@ych) i (L01_ =i
	@ykl) i (L01_ =i
	@ytm) i (L01_ =i

		i	(łby_	=i
		i	(łbym_	=i
		i	(łbyś_	=i
	@l)	i	(by_	=i
	@n)	i	(by_	=i
	@l)	i	(śmy_	=i
	@n)	i	(ście_	=i
	@l)	i	(ście_	=i

	@)	i	(byśmy_	=i
	@)	i	(byście_	=i

	@C)	ie	(libyśmy_	=;E
	@C)	ie	(libyście_	=;E
	@C)	ie	(liby_	=;E

	@C)	ia	(łybyśmy_	=;a
	@C)	ia	(łybyście_	=;a
	@C)	ia	(łyby_	=;a

.group	 j
		jazz	dZEz
		jazz	(_	dZEs
		j		j

	_)	james	dZEjms
	_)	jamesi	(e_	dZEjmS;
	_)	john	dZOn
	_)	johni	(e	dZOn^;
	_)	j	(im	dZ
	_)	j	(imen	h
	_)	jack	(_	dZEk
	_)	jack	(s	dZEk
	_)	jacky	(_	dZEki
	_)	jack	(y	dZEk
		jea	(ns	dZi
	_)	jeff		dZEf
	_)	jonath		dZOnat
	_)	jacques		Zak

.group	 k
		k		k
//		k	(i	c
		kł	(_	kw
//		ki	(A	kj
	_)	klow	(n	klaw

.group	 l
		l		l
		l	(_	l_
		li	(A	lj
	_po)	li	(A	li

.group	 ł
		ł		w
	A)	ł	(_	w_
	mys)	ł	(_	w_
		ł	(_

	@)	łbym	(_S1	m   // reduce entries in pl_list (jonsd)
	@)	łbyś	(_S1	S;

.group	 m
		m		m
		m	(_	m_
	A)	mi	(A	mj
	_zie)	mi	(A	m;
	_)	mj	(rA	majO
	_)	mc	(P2t	mEk

.group	 n
	@A)	nton	(_S4t	ntOn
	@A)	ngton	(_S5t	NgtOn
		n		n
		n	(_	n_
		n	(i	n^
		ni	(A	n^;
		n	(k	N
		n	(g	N
	a)	ng	(el	ndZ
		n	(ć	n^
		n	(ci	n^
		n	(dź	n^
		n	(dzi	n^
		noff	(_S4t	nOv
		noff	(om_	nOv
		noff	(ami_	nOv
		noff	(ach_	nOv
		noff	(u_	nOv
		noff	(ie_	nOv
		noff	(owi_	nOv
		noff	(em_	nOv
		noff	(a_	nOv

		ny	('emu_	n^;
		ny	('ego_	n^;

.group	 ń
		ń		n^

.group	 o
		o		O
		o	(_A	O:_
		oeth		Et
	_)	outsid		awtsajd
	_p)	oi	(rotA	uwa
	_d)	ow	(n	aw
	_rag)	out	(_	'u

	_n)	oteboo	(C	Owtbu

.group	 ó
		ó		u
	@)	ó	(Cłbym_	=u
	@)	ó	(Cłbyś_	=u
	@)	ó	(Cłby_	=u

.group	 p
		p		p

	_ko)	pi	(A	pj
	_fotoko)	pi	(A	pj

	_)	ppł	(k	pOtpuwkOvni
	_)	ppł	(c	pOtpuwkOvni
	_)	pł	(k	puwkOvni
	_)	pł	(c	puwkOvni

.group	 q
		q		k
		qu	(A	kv

.group	 r
		r		R
	A_)	r	(A	R
	K)	r	(A	R
		ri	(A	Rj
	A)	rr	(A	R
		rz		Z
		rz	(_	S
		rz	(and	Rts
	_mu)	rz	(asichl	Rz
	_mu)	rz	(o_+++	Rz
	_mu)	rz	(owie_+++	Rz
	_mu)	rz	(ą_+++	Rz
	_mu)	rz	(y_+++	Rz
	_mu)	rz	(ę_+++	Rz
	_mu)	rz	(a_+++	Rz
	_mu)	rz	(ów_+++	Rz
	_mu)	rz	(ami_+++	Rz
	_mu)	rz	(ach_+++	Rz
	_mi)	rz	(o_+++	Rz
	_mi)	rz	(owie_+++	Rz
	_mi)	rz	(ą_+++	Rz
	_mi)	rz	(y_+++	Rz
	_mi)	rz	(ę_+++	Rz
	_mi)	rz	(a_+++	Rz
	_mi)	rz	(ów_+++	Rz
	_mi)	rz	(ami_+++	Rz
	_mi)	rz	(ach_+++	Rz
	c)	rz	(A	S
	ć)	rz	(A	S
	cz)	rz	(A	S
	f)	rz	(A	S
	h)	rz		S
	k)	rz		S
	p)	rz		S
	s)	rz	(A	S
	ś)	rz	(A	S
	sz)	rz	(A	S
	t)	rz		S
		rz	(ini_	Rts
		rz	(inim_	Rts
		rz	(inimi_	Rts
		rz	(inich_	Rts
		rz	(iniemu_	Rts
		rz	(iniego_	Rts
		rz	(oni_	Rts
		rz	(onim_	Rts
		rz	(onimi_	Rts
		rz	(onich_	Rts
		rz	(oniemu_	Rts
		rz	(oniego_	Rts
		r	(zi	R
	A)	r	(zł	R
	ma)	r	(zn	R
	ma)	r	(zlin	R
	_zama)	r	(za	R
	_zma)	r	(za	R
	odma)	r	(za	R
	_bo)	r	(zoj	R

		ry'	(e	R
.group	 s

	@)	son	(_S3t	sOn
	@)	sen	(_S3t	sEn
	_salce)	son	(_++	=sOn
	_pati)	son	(_++	=sOn

	_)	sea	(n_	SO
	_)	sea	(nowi_	SO
	_)	sea	(nem_	SO
	_)	sea	(nie_	SO
	_)	sea	(nu_	SO
	_)	sea	(na_	SO
	y)	stein		stEin
		stein	(_S5t	Stajn
		stein		Stajn
		s		s
	_qua)	s	(i	z
		si	(nus	si
		si	(ng	si
		si	(liko	si
		si	(lv	si
		si	(los	si
		si	(ll	si
		si	(r	si
	du)	si	(gr	S;i
		si	(g	si
		si	(h	si
		si	(cA	S;i
		si	(cz	S;i
		si	(ch	S;i
		si	(c	si
		si	(dlA	S;i
		si	(dl_	S;i
		si	(dł	S;i
		si	(d	si
		si	(f	si
	plek)	si	(_	si
	_mak)	si	(_	si
	s)	si	(mie_	=i
	s)	si	(mem_	=i
	s)	si	(ma_	=i
	s)	si	(mo_	=i
		si	(m	si
		si	(brz	S;i
		si	(b	si
		si	(v	si
		si	(q	si
		si	(x	si
	_)	si	(tA	S;i
	_)	si	(t_	S;i
	_)	si	(tk	S;i
		si	(t	si

		s	(i	S;
		si	(A	S;
		sz		S
	_anasta) si	(o_	sj
	_anasta) si	(ą_	sj
	_anasta) si	(ę_	sj
	_anasta) si	(i_	sj
	_anasta) si	(a_	sj

		skj	(A	S

		scherz		skERts
		sch	(ą	sx
		sch	(ę	sx
	pa)	sch	(a	sx
		sch	(ł	sx
	_)	sch	(ety	sx
		sch	(odzą	sx
		sch	(odzę	sx
		sch	(odzi	sx
		sch	(ody_	sx
		sch	(odow	sx
		sch	(odó	sx
		sch	(odami_	sx
		sch	(odach_	sx
		sch	(odek_	sx
		sch	(odka	sx
		sch	(odkowi_	sx
		sch	(odkiem_	sx
		sch	(odku_		sx
		sch	(odki		sx
		sch	(odkó		sx
		sch	(odkow		sx
		sch	(ną	sx
		sch	(nę	sx
		sch	(nię	sx
		sch	(nie_	sx
		sch	(wytA	sx
		sch	(wyci	sx
		sch	(emat	sx
		sch	(ó	sx
		sch	(owa	sx
		sch	(ron_	sx
		sch	(ronA	sx
	_w)	sch	(od	sx
		sch	(owA	sx
		sch	(rzA	sx
		sch	(udn	sx
		sch	(ył	sx
		sch	(ylA	sx
	_)	sch	(yl_	sx
		sch	(rup_	sx
		sch	(rupanA	sx
		sch	(rupali	sx
		sch	(rupać_	sx
		sch	(rupał	sx
		sch	(rupiA	sx
		sch	(rypł	sx
		sch	(rypl	sx
		sch	(rypA	sx
		sch	(orowa	sx
		sch	(orze	sx
		sch	(amiA	sx
		sch	(abowA	sx
		sch	(abosz	sx
		sch	(ab_	sx
		sch	(abA_	sx
		sch	(abem_	sx
		sch	(abie_	sx
		sch	(abó	sx
		sch	(abami_	sx
		sch	(abom	sx
	e)	sch	(ato	sx
		sch	(adzk	sx
		sch	(adzA	sx
		sch	(am_	sx
		sch	(ami	sx
		sch	(arakt	sx
		sch	(edA	sx
		sch	(ed_	sx
		sch	(izmA	sx
		sch	(izm_	sx
		sch	(izo	sx
		sch	(ludnA	sx
		sch	(lać	sx
		sch	(lanA	sx
		sch	(lali	sx
		sch	(leli	sx
		sch	(lał	sx
	_)	sch	(leb_	sx
	_)	sch	(lebi	sx
	_)	sch	(etyn	sx

		schwarz		SvaRts
		schoe		SE
		sch		S

.group	 ś
		ś		S;
		ść	(dzie	Z;

.group	 t
		t		t
		t	(i	t;
		ti	(A	tj
		t	(rz	t|
		t	(s	t|
		town	(_S4t	tawn
		tthew		sju
.group	 u
		u		u
		u(_A		u_
	a)	u		w
	e)	u		w
	na)	u	(k	u
	na)	u	(cz	u
	_za)	u	(to	w
	_za)	u		u
	para)	u		u
	meta)	u		u
	Ce)	u	(s	u
	_nie)	u		u
	_prze)	u		u
	Ce)	u	(m_	u
	@)	u	(łbym_	=u
	@)	u	(łbyś_	=u
	@)	u	(łby_	=u
	_bl)	uetooth		utuf

	_m)	usic	(al_	j'uzik
	_m)	usic	(al	juzik
	_b)	uick		wik
	_l)	unch		antS

.group	 v
		v		v
	f)	v	(A	f
	h)	v	(A	f
	k)	v	(A	f
	p)	v	(A	f
	s)	v	(A	f
	t)	v	(A	f
		v	(olks	f
		ville	(_S5t	vil
	_)	vice	(@P4t	witsE

.group	 w
		w		v
		w (sk		_v
	ier)	wsz	(A	S
		w	(_	f
	c)	w	(A	f
	ć)	w	(A	f
	cz)	w	(A	f

	_)	w	(_c	f
	_)	w	(_f	wE
	_)	w	(_h	f
	_)	w	(_k	f
	_)	w	(_p	f
	_)	w	(_s	f
	_)	w	(_t	f
	_)	w	(_mn	wE // 'w' should be written 'we' before 'mn', but not always
	_)	w	(_	w

	f)	w	(A	f
	h)	w	(A	f
	k)	w	(A	f
	p)	w	(A	f
	s)	w	(A	f
	ś)	w	(A	f
	sz)	w	(A	f
	t)	w	(A	f
	_)	wice	(@P4t	vitsE
	_)	window		wyndOw
		wee	(k	wi
	_)	washi		wOSi
		wrigh		Raj
	C)	wrigh		Raj

.group	 x
		x		ks

.group	 y
		y		y
		y	(_A	y_
	_)	y	(A	j
	A)	y	(A	j
	A)	y	(_	j
	_pat)	y	(++	y

	r)	y'	(emu_
	r)	y'	(ego_
	C)	y'	(emu_	;
	C)	y'	(ego_	;
